Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 88.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2010
82-108.02
Historical
Society Fund; created; use; investment.

All funds
received by the Nebraska State Historical Society for services rendered shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Historical Society Fund
which is hereby established. Funds to the credit of the fund shall only be
expended, as and when appropriated by the Legislature, by the Nebraska State
Historical Society for the general purposes of such society, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in
the Historical Society Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 1961, c. 439, § 1, p. 1357;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 110, p. 2416;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 138;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 88.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.